Arkansas, session 2025, SB17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title. This act shall be known and may be
cited as "Lux's Law".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-60-101(a), concerning abuse of a corpse,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person commits abuse of a corpse if, except as authorized by
law, he or she knowingly:
(1) Disinters, removes, dissects, or mutilates a corpse; or
(2) Sells a corpse, or any part of a corpse, after the corpse
has been authorized for final disposition through cremation or burial; or
(2)(A)(3)(A) Physically mistreats or conceals a corpse in a
manner offensive to a person of reasonable sensibilities.
(B) A person who conceals a corpse in a manner offensive
*ANS097*
02-13-2025 10:15:55 ANS097

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S2/13/25 SB17
to a person of reasonable sensibilities that results in the corpse remaining
concealed is continuing in a course of conduct under § 5-1-109(e)(1)(B).
(C)(i) As used in this section, “in a manner offensive to
a person of reasonable sensibilities” means in a manner that is outside the
normal practices of handling or disposing of a corpse.
(ii) “In a manner offensive to a person of reasonable
sensibilities” includes without limitation the dismembering, submerging, or
burning of a corpse.

/s/F. Love


























02-13-2025 10:15:55 ANS097